Utah statutes.
54-17-202.   Requirements for solicitation.

(1)  The commission shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, outlining the requirements for a solicitation process.  The rules required by this Subsection (1) shall include:

(a)  the type of screening criteria an affected electrical utility may use in a solicitation process including the risks an affected electrical utility may consider;

(b)  the required disclosures by an affected electrical utility if a solicitation includes a benchmark option;

(c)  the required disclosures by an affected electrical utility related to the methodology the affected electrical utility uses to evaluate bids; and

(d)  the participation of an independent evaluator in a manner consistent with Section 54-17-203.

(2)  If an affected electrical utility is subject to regulation in more than one state regarding the acquisition, construction, or cost recovery of a significant energy resource, in making the rules required by Subsection (1), the commission may consider the impact of the multistate regulation including requirements imposed by other states as to:

(a)  the solicitation process;

(b)  cost recovery of resources; and

(c)  methods by which the affected electrical utility may be able to mitigate the potential for cost disallowances.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

